Missouri, session 2026, SB1398.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 393.1025, RSMo, is repealed and one
new section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section
393.1025, to read as follows:
393.1025. As used in sections 393.1020 to 393.1030,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Commission", the public service commission;
(2) "Department", the department of economic
development;
(3) "Electric utility", any electrical corporation as
defined by section 386.020;
(4) "Renewable energy credit" or "REC", a tradeable
certificate of proof that one megawatt-hour of electricity
has been generated from renewable energy sources; and
(5) "Renewable energy resources", electric energy
produced from wind, solar thermal sources, photovoltaic
cells and panels, nuclear energy sources, hydrogen,
dedicated crops grown for energy production, cellulosic
agricultural residues, plant residues, methane from
landfills, from agricultural operations, or from wastewater
treatment, thermal depolymerization or pyrolysis for
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1398 2
converting waste material to energy, clean and untreated
wood such as pallets, hydropower (not including pumped
storage) that does not require a new diversion or
impoundment of water and that has a nameplate rating of ten
megawatts or less, fuel cells using hydrogen produced by one
of the above-named renewable energy sources, and other
sources of energy [not including nuclear] that become
available after November 4, 2008, and are certified as
renewable by rule by the department.
✓